Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.720

Authority of supporter.

A supporter may exercise the authority granted to the supporter in the supported decision-making agreement.

[ 2020 c 312 s 605.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.